North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-45 Civil Air Patrol

54-45-00.1.
Civil air patrol defined — Declaration of policy.

“Civil air patrol” means the private nonprofit corporation chartered under federal law [36 U.S.C. 201-208]. It is the purpose of this chapter to declare the intent of the state of North Dakota to continue to provide financial support to the North Dakota wing of the civil air patrol to enable the civil air patrol to continue to provide to the state of North Dakota communications services, cadet training, disaster relief, search and rescue missions or assistance, and other related functions within the scope of the activity of the civil air patrol and administrative support personnel necessary to support these services and functions.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 613, § 1.

54-45-01.
Department of civil air patrol — Commanding officer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 613, § 5.

54-45-02.
Cooperation with state and federal governments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 613, § 5.

54-45-03.
Expenditure of funds — Limitation.

The commanding officer, North Dakota wing, civil air patrol, may expend appropriated grant funds as administered by the adjutant general. A report of expenditure of grant funds must be issued to the adjutant general annually. A general fund grant line item must be appropriated within the adjutant general’s budget. These funds may be expended to support the mission of the civil air patrol as determined by the commanding officer. No funds may be expended for uniforms or personal equipment of any member of the civil air patrol. All state equipment on inventory with the civil air patrol on July 7, 1991, and related to the mission of the civil air patrol must be transferred to the North Dakota wing of the civil air patrol.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 364, §§ 3, 4; 1977, ch. 498, § 1; 1979, ch. 569, § 2; 1991, ch. 613, § 2; 1995, ch. 39, § 7.

54-45-04.
Workmen’s compensation coverage authorized. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 613, § 5.